Wisconsin, session 2025, SB826.
do enact as follows:SB826,13Section 1. 46.03 (18) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB826,2,11146.03 (18) (b) Except as provided in s. 46.10 (14) (b) and (c), any person 2receiving services provided or purchased under par. (a) or the spouse of the person 3and, in the case of a minor, the parents of the person, and, in the case of a foreign 4child described in s. 48.839 (1) who became dependent on public funds for his or her 5primary support before an order granting his or her adoption, the resident of this 6state appointed guardian of the child by a foreign court who brought the child into 7this state for the purpose of adoption, shall be liable for the services in the amount 8of the fee established under par. (a). If a minor receives services without consent of 9a parent or guardian under s. 51.138 or, 51.47, or 252.043, the department or, if 10applicable, the county department shall base the fee solely on the minor’s ability to 11pay.SB826,212Section 2. 252.043 of the statutes is created to read:SB826,2,1713252.043 Vaccination of a minor without parental consent. (1) A 14physician or other health care provider who is authorized to administer a 15vaccination shall administer a medically appropriate vaccine to a minor who is 16 16years of age or older and who requests to be vaccinated, regardless of whether a 17parent or guardian of the minor consents to the vaccination of the minor.SB826,3,218(2) For a vaccination administered under this section when a parent or 19guardian refuses to provide consent, the physician or other health care provider 20shall obtain the minor’s consent before billing a 3rd party for the services. If the 21minor does not consent to billing a 3rd party, the minor shall be responsible for 1paying for the services, which the department shall bill to the minor as provided 2under s. 46.03 (18) (b).SB826,3,33